Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5888.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3009. (1) Subject to subsections (5) to (8), an automobile liability or motor vehicle liability policy that insures against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for property damage, bodily injury, or death suffered by any person arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle must not be delivered or issued for delivery in this state with respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this state unless the liability coverage is subject to all of the following limits: (a) Before July 2, 2020, a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than $20,000.00 because of bodily injury to or death of 1 person in any 1 accident, and after July 1, 2020, For a policy delivered or issued for delivery before July 1, 2027, a limit , exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than $250,000.00 or, for a policy delivered or issued for delivery after June 30, 2027, not less than $25,000.00, exclusive of interest and costs, because of bodily injury to or death of 1 person in any 1 accident. (b) Before July 2, 2020 and subject to the limit for 1 person in subdivision (a), a limit of not less than $40,000.00 because of bodily injury to or death of 2 or more persons in any 1 accident, and after July 1, 2020, and subject Subject to the limit for 1 person in subdivision (a), for a policy delivered or issued for delivery before July 1, 2027, a limit of not less than $500,000.00 or, for a policy delivered or issued for delivery after June 30, 2027, not less than $50,000.00 because of bodily injury to or death of 2 or more persons in any 1 accident. (c) A limit of not less than $10,000.00 because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any accident. (2) If authorized by the insured, automobile liability or motor vehicle liability coverage may be excluded when a vehicle is operated by a named person. An exclusion under this subsection is not valid unless the following notice is on the face of the policy or the declaration page or certificate of the policy and on the certificate of insurance: Warningâwhen a named excluded person operates a vehicle all liability coverage is voidâno one is insured. Owners of the vehicle and others legally responsible for the acts of the named excluded person remain fully personally liable. (3) A liability policy described in subsection (1) may exclude coverage for liability as provided in section 3017 or 3018. (4) If an insurer deletes coverages from an automobile insurance policy under section 3101, the insurer shall send documentary evidence of the deletion to the insured. (5) After July 1, 2020, Before July 1, 2027, an applicant for or named insured in the automobile liability or motor vehicle liability policy described in subsection (1) may choose to purchase lower limits than required under subsection (1)(a) and (b), but not lower than $50,000.00 under subsection (1)(a) and $100,000.00 under subsection (1)(b). To exercise an option under this subsection, the person shall complete a form issued by the director and provided as required by section 3107e, that meets the requirements of subsection (7). (6) After July 1, 2020, Before July 1, 2027, and subject to section 3015, on application for the issuance of a new policy or renewal of an existing policy, an insurer shall do all of the following: (a) Provide the applicant or named insured the liability options available under this section. (b) Provide the applicant or named insured a price for each option available under this section. (c) Offer the applicant or named insured the option and form under this subsection. (7) The form required under subsection (5) must do all of the following: (a) State, in a conspicuous manner, the risks of choosing liability limits lower than those required by subsection (1)(a) and (b). (b) Provide For an initial selection, provide a way for the person to mark the form to acknowledge that he or she the person has received a list of the liability options available under this section and the price for each option. (c) Provide For an initial selection, provide a way for the person to mark the form to acknowledge that he or she the person has read the form and understands the risks of choosing the lower liability limits. (d) State, in a conspicuous manner, that a coverage level selection will remain in effect while the insured remains insured with the same insurer or an affiliate of the insurer unless the insured selects a different coverage option. (e) (d) Allow the person to sign the form. (8) After July 1, 2020, Before July 1, 2027, if an insurance policy is issued or renewed as described in subsection (1) and the person named in the policy has not made an effective choice under subsection (5), the limits under subsection (1)(a) and (b) apply to the policy. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5886 (request no. H01583'25). (b) House Bill No. 5889 (request no. H01583'25 g). (c) House Bill No. 5887 (request no. H03545'25).